Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Medical Assistance Act
71-5-191. Uniform TennCare claims process.

Not later than January 1, 2002, the commissioner of commerce and insurance, in consultation with the commissioner of health, shall develop and promulgate by rule a uniform TennCare claims process that contains standardized instructions for completing the form and creates standardized responses to questions and other information required on the form, for providers and managed care organizations participating in the TennCare program to use in the submission of claims by providers seeking payment. Each managed care organization, or its designee that participates in the TennCare program may participate in the development of such uniform claims process. The commissioner of commerce and insurance shall notify all such managed care organizations no less than ten (10) days prior to any and all meetings concerning the development of such claims process to enable such organizations to provide input on the development of such claims process. The uniform process shall require that managed care organizations participating in the TennCare program shall not deviate from the uniform process established by rule pursuant to this section, unless such deviation is specifically approved in writing by TennCare prior to any change being implemented that might result in a claim being rejected for payment. TennCare shall not approve any changes to standardized instructions that do not relate to using alternative codes to facilitate payment for delivered services. Compliance with this section shall be added as a component of the comptroller's annual audit. In addition, such managed care organizations shall be required to develop and implement procedures to ensure that health care providers are regularly informed and educated by the managed care organization regarding billing and claims processing procedures.

Any managed care organization that fails to comply with this section shall be subject to the penalties set forth in § 56-32-116 or, in the alternative, § 56-32-120.

Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

If this section conflicts with any applicable federal waiver concerning medical assistance services delivered pursuant to chapter 5, part 1 of this title, then the commissioner of health is directed to seek an appropriate modification or amendment to such waiver to permit the implementation of this section.

This section shall be construed so as to be consistent with the terms of any applicable federal waiver for the provision of medical assistance.

Acts 2001, ch. 209, § 1.

71-5-192. Information management system.

On or before January 1, 2004, a comprehensive, integrated information management system will be operational for the bureau of TennCare. Not less frequently than quarterly, the division of strategic technology solutions in the department of finance and administration shall provide progress assessments concerning such system to the information systems council (ISC) and the fiscal review committee.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 4; 2020, ch. 690, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and reverifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “division of strategic technology solutions” for “office of information resources”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 690, § 22. June 11, 2020.

71-5-193. Children's mental health care — Development of interagency projects and programs.

The department shall involve the council in the development of interagency projects and programs, whether state or federally funded, related to children's mental health care, except where otherwise prohibited by state or federal law.

Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-5-193 (Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 4), concerning the establishment of a TennCare advisory board, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 410, § 1, effective June 23, 2003.

For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

71-5-194. Spend down eligibility for medical assistance.

On or before July 1, 2003, the department of human services shall make available on the department of human services' web page all rules, operating procedures and any other similar material relative to determining an individual's spend down eligibility for medical assistance under this chapter and the operating procedures and any other similar material necessary for a pharmacy to determine which prescriptions used to qualify the patient for TennCare through the spend down eligibility criteria are eligible to be billed to the TennCare program based on the effective date of eligibility for medical assistance.

Acts 2003, ch. 131, § 1.

71-5-195. Study on use of prescription drugs in nursing homes.

The comptroller of the treasury, in conjunction with any appropriate TennCare drug utilization review committees, shall study the use of prescription drugs in nursing homes and the costs of those prescription drugs for residents of nursing homes. The study shall examine prescription use overall, and shall focus on any practices that would improve the quality of resident care while reducing costs to the TennCare program. By January 1, 2005, the comptroller of the treasury shall deliver its report to the speakers of the respective houses of the general assembly.

Acts 2003, ch. 169, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 169, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Nursing Home Compassion, Accountability, Respect and Enforcement Reform Act”.

71-5-196. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.

71-5-197. Authority over TennCare pharmacy purchases — Confidential information — Exemption from open meeting laws.

The bureau of TennCare is authorized to remove pharmacy services from managed care organization (MCO) contracts and assume direct responsibility for all TennCare pharmacy purchases.

The bureau of TennCare is authorized to implement, either independently or in combination with a state preferred drug list (PDL), cost saving measures for pharmaceutical services, including, but not limited to, tiered co-payments, reference pricing, prior authorization and step therapy requirements; provided, however, that any prior approval process shall, at a minimum, comply with 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-8(d)(5), which requires a response to a request for prior authorization within twenty-four (24) hours and further requires at least a seventy-two (72) hour supply of a covered outpatient drug in an emergency situation.

The bureau of TennCare, through a state pharmacy benefit manager (PBM) or on its own, is authorized to negotiate supplemental manufacturer rebates for TennCare prescription drug purchases; provided, however, that when conducting such negotiations, the bureau or PBM, or both, shall utilize the average manufacturer's price (AMP) as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-8(k)(1) or any other recognized acceptable basis for negotiating rebates as the cost basis for the product.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all information and documents containing trade secrets, proprietary information, rebate amounts for individual drugs or individual manufacturers, percent of rebate for individual drugs or individual manufacturers, and manufacturer's pricing that are contained in records of the TennCare bureau, the state of Tennessee and its agents shall be confidential and shall not be a public record for the purposes of title 10, chapter 7, part 5. Nothing in this subsection (d) shall be construed to prohibit the TennCare bureau and the state of Tennessee from disclosing the information covered by this subsection (d) to members of the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee, who shall be deemed agents of the state of Tennessee for purposes of this subsection (d).

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, those portions of meetings of the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee at which information described in subsection (d) is disclosed for discussion are exempt from title 8, chapter 44.

The bureau of TennCare shall promulgate rules to promote the safe and responsible coverage of opioids for TennCare members who have the TennCare pharmacy benefit. The rules must, at a minimum, address prior authorization requirements for opioid prescriptions, as determined by the bureau, to reduce the development of opioid dependency and addiction. For women of child-bearing age, when prior authorization is required for an opioid prescription, the rules must require the provider to submit information regarding pregnancy status, contraceptive use, and the provision of counseling regarding the risks of becoming pregnant while receiving opioid medication. The information regarding pregnancy status and contraceptive use may, when appropriate, be based on self-reporting by the patient.

The rules required by this subsection (f) shall be promulgated pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. On or before January 1, 2019, the bureau shall report to both the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives regarding the status of the rules required by this subsection (f).

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 3; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 12, 13; 2018, ch. 864, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by this part, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of this part that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of the bureau of TennCare to negotiate supplemental manufacturer rebates for TennCare prescription drug purchases, OAG 05-001, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/05/05).

71-5-198. Prescription drug program waiver.

If necessary, the bureau of TennCare is authorized to seek a research and demonstration waiver under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act from the United States department of health and human services to create a TennCare prescription program, subject to funding by the general assembly and the terms and conditions imposed by the waiver.

To the extent and only to the extent permitted by federal law or the terms of the waiver, the TennCare prescription program may provide a prescription benefit to individuals lacking prescription drug insurance coverage who meet criteria established by the bureau of TennCare and the general assembly in its annual appropriation bill.

To the extent permitted by federal law and the TennCare waiver, the bureau of TennCare may implement, either independently or in combination with a state preferred drug list (PDL), cost saving measures for pharmaceutical services including, but not limited to, tiered co-payments, reference pricing, prior authorization, step therapy requirements, exclusion from coverage of drugs or classes of drugs, mandating the use of generic drugs, and mandating the use of therapeutic equivalent drugs.

To the extent permitted by federal law or the terms of the waiver, the bureau of TennCare, through a state pharmacy benefit manager (PBM) or on its own, may negotiate manufacturer rebates for TennCare prescription drug purchases. The bureau of TennCare shall retain ultimate authority to negotiate or contract directly with a pharmaceutical manufacturer, in the interest of implementing rebates or other cost saving measures and for other purposes permitted by this section. Notwithstanding anything under Tennessee law to the contrary, the bureau's designation of a negotiating agent shall not infringe upon the state's ability to negotiate and contract directly with pharmaceutical manufacturers.

To the extent permitted by federal law or the terms of the waiver, the bureau of TennCare may establish an open enrollment period based on appropriations from the general assembly.

To the extent permitted by federal law or the terms of the waiver, the bureau of TennCare may contract with another department or a private entity to conduct an eligibility determination. The bureau or a contracted entity may implement an eligibility determination process to ensure participants comply with eligibility standards set by the bureau and the general assembly.

As permitted by the waiver or federal law, program participants may purchase prescription drugs through pharmacies participating in the state network.

To the extent permitted by federal law or the terms of the waiver, the bureau of TennCare may establish an enrollment fee to defray administrative expenses associated with the program.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 4; 2004, ch. 673, § 14; 2005, ch. 442, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Section 1115 waiver, referred to this section, refers to Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, and is codified in 42 U.S.C. 1315.

Acts 2003, ch. 350, § 6 provided that if a court of competent jurisdiction enjoins, restrains or stays programs authorized by this part, then the department of finance and administration or the bureau of TennCare as appropriate is authorized to proceed to implement as appropriate those portions of this part that have not been lawfully enjoined, restrained or stayed.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

71-5-199. State preferred drug list.

The bureau of TennCare may, in its sole discretion, adopt or amend a state preferred drug list (PDL). The adoption or amendment of a PDL, and the recommendations of the TennCare pharmacy advisory committee to the bureau are not agency actions and do not require rulemaking.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.